el: Μηχανισμός όπλισης: Σύστημα AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Σπαστό/κάτω μοχλού; Αποσπώμενη/εξωτερική μανιβέλα; Ενσωματωμένη μανιβέλα; Χειροκίνητη όπλιση; Σύστημα με τρόμπα ή αυτόματη επαναφορά; Μηχανισμός όπλισης με σχοινί; Έλκηθρο όπλισης (rope sled); Μοχλός αυτόματης όπλισης; Άλλο
bg-BG: Механизъм за опъване: Система AccuSlide/ACUdraw; С чупеща се цев/долен лост; Разглобяема/външна манивела; Интегрирана манивела; Ръчно изтегляне; Система с помпа или автоматично прибиране; Въже за зареждане; Въже с шейна; Лост за самозареждане; Други
pt-BR: Mecanismo de engatilhamento: Sistema AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Cano basculante/alavanca inferior; Manivela externa/removível; Manivela integrada; Puxada manual; Sistema de bombeamento ou retração automática; Corda de armar; Trenó de corda; Alavanca de armar automática; Outros
nb: Oppspenningsmekanisme: AccuSlide/ACUdraw-system; Knekk-/underspak; Avtakbar/ekstern sveiv; Integrert sveiv; Manuell trekking; Pumpe- eller autoretursystem; Spennenhet med tau; Tauslede; Selvspennende spak; Annet
en: Cocking mechanism: AccuSlide/ACUdraw system; Break/under-lever; Detachable/external crank; Integrated crank; Manual draw; Pump or auto-retract system; Rope cocking device; Rope sled; Self-cocking lever; Other
pl: Mechanizm napinający: System AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Lufa łamana / dolny naciąg; Korba odłączana / zewnętrzna; Zintegrowana korba; Naciąg ręczny; System pompki lub autozwijania; Naciągacz sznurowy; Naciągacz wózkowy (rope sled); Dźwignia samonapinająca; Inny
sk-SK: Napínací mechanizmus: Systém AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Zlamovacia/spodná páka; Odnímateľná/externá kľuka; Integrovaná kľuka; Manuálne natiahnutie; Pumpovací alebo samonavíjací systém; Naťahovacie lanko; Naťahovacie sánky; Samonaťahovacia páka; Iné
zh-CN: 上弦装置: AccuSlide/ACUdraw 系统; 折管/下压杆式; 可拆卸/外部曲柄式; 集成曲柄式; 手动拉弦; 泵动或自动收回系统; 上弦绳装置; 上弦滑块; 自上弦拉杆; 其他
nl: Spanmechanisme: AccuSlide/ACUdraw-systeem; Knikloop/onderspanner; Afneembare/externe zwengel; Geïntegreerde zwengel; Handmatig spannen; Pomp- of automatisch intrekmechanisme; Spanhulp met touw; Spanslede met touw; Zelfspannende hendel; Overig
zh-TW: 上膛機制: AccuSlide/ACUdraw 系統; 下折/下壓桿; 可拆卸/外置曲柄; 內建曲柄; 手動拉弦; 泵動或自動收回系統; 繩索拉弦器; 滑橇式繩索拉弦器; 自拉弦槓桿; 其他
lt-LT: Įtempimo mechanizmas: „AccuSlide“ / „ACUdraw“ sistema; Laužiamas vamzdis / apatinė svirtis; Nuimama / išorinė rankenėlė; Integruota rankenėlė; Rankinis tempimas; Pompinė arba automatinio įtraukimo sistema; Tempimo virvės įtaisas; Virvės tempiklis; Savaiminio užsitaisymo svirtis; Kita
hu: Felhúzó mechanizmusa: AccuSlide/ACUdraw rendszer; Csőtörős/alsókaros; Levehető/külső hajtókar; Integrált hajtókar; Kézi felhúzás; Pumpás vagy automatikusan visszahúzódó rendszer; Köteles felhúzóeszköz; Kötélszán; Önfelhúzó kar; Egyéb
da: Spændemekanisme: AccuSlide/ACUdraw-system; Knækløb/underspændestang; Aftageligt/eksternt håndsving; Integreret håndsving; Manuelt træk; Pumpe- eller auto-retract-system; Spændesnor; Spændeslæde; Selvspændende håndtag; Andet
ro-RO: Mecanism de armare: Sistem AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Frângere/pârghie inferioară; Manivelă detașabilă/externă; Manivelă integrată; Armare manuală; Sistem cu pompă sau retragere automată; Dispozitiv de armare cu frânghie; Sanie cu frânghie (rope sled); Pârghie cu armare automată; Altele
cs: Natahovací mechanismus: Systém AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Zlamovací / spodní nátah; Odnímatelná/externí klika; Integrovaná klika; Manuální nátah; Pumpovací nebo samonavíjecí systém; Natahovák tětivy; Natahovací vozíček; Samonatahovací páka; Jiný
fi: Viritysmekanismi: AccuSlide/ACUdraw-järjestelmä; Taittopiippu / alavipu; Irrotettava / ulkoinen kampi; Integroitu kampi; Manuaalinen veto; Pumppu- tai automaattipalautusjärjestelmä; Viritysnaru; Virityskelkka; Itsevirittyvä vipu; Muu
pt-PT: Mecanismo de armar: Sistema AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Cano basculante/alavanca inferior; Manivela amovível/externa; Manivela integrada; Tração manual; Sistema de bomba ou retração automática; Dispositivo de armar com corda; Deslizador de corda; Alavanca de armar automática; Outro
it: Meccanismo di armamento: Sistema AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Canna basculante/leva inferiore; Manovella rimovibile/esterna; Manovella integrata; Trazione manuale; Sistema a pompa o auto-retrattile; Dispositivo di armamento a corda (Rope Cocker); Slitta a corda; Leva autoarmante; Altro
hr-HR: Mehanizam napinjanja: Sustav AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Preklopna / donja poluga; Odvojiva/vanjska ručica; Ugrađena ručica; Ručno natezanje; Pumpni ili automatski povratni sustav; Uže za natezanje; Sustav s užetom i klizačem; Samo-natezna poluga; Ostalo
sv: Laddningsmekanism: AccuSlide/ACUdraw-system; Brytpipa/underspännare; Löstagbar/extern vev; Integrerad vev; Manuell dragning; Pump- eller autorekylerande system; Uppspänningslina; Linsläde; Självspännande hävarm; Övrigt
es: Mecanismo de amartillado: Sistema AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Quiebre/palanca inferior; Manivela desmontable/externa; Manivela integrada; Tensado manual; Sistema de bombeo o autorretráctil; Dispositivo tensor de cuerda; Carro para cuerda; Palanca de autotensado; Otro
ru: Механизм взвода: Система AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Переломный ствол / подствольный рычаг; Съемный / внешний натяжитель; Встроенный натяжитель; Ручное натяжение; Помповая или самовозвратная система; Ручной натяжитель с веревкой; Веревочный натяжитель (салазки); Рычаг самовзвода; Другое
fr: Mécanisme d'armement: Système AccuSlide/ACUdraw; À bascule/levier inférieur; Manivelle externe / détachable; Manivelle intégrée; Armement manuel; Système à pompe ou à rétractation automatique; Bandoir à corde; Traîneau d'armement; Levier d’auto-armement; Autre
ko: 코킹 메커니즘: AccuSlide/ACUdraw 시스템; 브레이크/언더 레버; 탈착식/외부 크랭크; 통합형 크랭크; 수동 드로; 펌프 또는 자동 접이 시스템; 로프 코킹 장치; 로프 슬레드; 셀프 코킹 레버; 기타
ja: コッキングメカニズム: AccuSlide/ACUdrawシステム; 中折れ/アンダーレバー式; 着脱式/外部クランク; 内蔵クランク; マニュアルドロー; ポンプ/オートリトラクトシステム; ロープコッキングデバイス; ロープスレッド; セルフコッキングレバー; その他
de: Spannmechanismus: AccuSlide/ACUdraw-System; Knicklauf/Unterhebel; Abnehmbare/externe Kurbel; Integrierte Kurbel; Manueller Auszug; Pump- oder Auto-Retract-System; Seilspannhilfe; Spannschlitten; Selbstspannender Hebel; Andere
sl-SI: Mehanizem za napenjanje: Sistem AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Prelomna/spodnja ročica; Snemljiva/zunanja navijalna ročica; Vgrajena navijalna ročica; Ročni poteg; Črpalka ali sistem samodejnega uvlečenja; Napenjalnik na vrv; Napenjalne sani z vrvjo; Samonapenjalna ročica; Drugo
vi: Cơ chế lên cò: Hệ thống AccuSlide/ACUdraw; Bẻ nòng/đòn bẩy dưới; Tay quay tháo rời/ngoài; Tay quay tích hợp; Kéo thủ công; Hệ thống bơm hoặc tự rụt; Dây kéo lên cò; Thanh trượt dây kéo; Đòn bẩy tự lên cò; Khác
tr: Kurma mekanizması: AccuSlide/ACUdraw sistemi; Kırmalı/alttan kurmalı; Çıkarılabilir/harici krank; Entegre krank; Manuel germe; Pompalı veya otomatik geri sarma sistemi; İpli kurma cihazı; İpli kızak; Kendinden kurmalı kol; Diğer
th: กลไกการขึ้นสาย: ระบบ AccuSlide/ACUdraw; หักลำ/คันโยกด้านล่าง; ข้อเหวี่ยงภายนอก/ถอดได้; ข้อเหวี่ยงในตัว; ดึงด้วยมือ; ระบบปั๊มหรือดึงกลับอัตโนมัติ; อุปกรณ์ขึ้นสายแบบเชือก; แคร่เชือก; คันโยกขึ้นสายในตัว; อื่นๆ